test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuodas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - njuođâs: # 2A
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuoˊtâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuoˊtâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuoˊtâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: [njuođâsin, njuoˊtâsin]
    njuođâs+N+Par: [njuođâsid, njuoˊtâsid]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: [njuoˊtâseh, njuottâseh]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: [njuoˊtâsij, njuottâsij]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: [njuoˊtâsijd, njuot'tâsijd]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: [njuoˊtâsáid, njuot'tâsáid]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: [njuoˊtâsijn, njuot'tâsijn]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: [njuoˊtâsijguin, njuot'tâsijguin]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: [njuoˊtâsijttáá, njuot'tâsijttáá]
